English
English
中文
Privacy Policy
Last Updated: Oct 18, 2024
Your privacy is important to us (
Dream United, Ltd., the “team”, “we” or “us”
). This Privacy Policy (the
"Policy"
) describes how we collect, use, store and otherwise process personal data that we collect or receive from or about you.
Accordingly, this Policy is a master Privacy Policy, and references herein to the "Services" shall mean the Apps, the Web Services, and the Websites collectively and/or individually (as the case may be).
By using our Service, you agree to the terms of this policy and you expressly consent to the collection, use, and process of your personal information in accordance with this policy.
Please be assured that we or other people can’t see or get the files what you recorded or edited. All videos, photos, audios you record or edit are saved only on your device. It won't be uploaded or shared without your permission.
PERSONAL DATA WE COLLECT OR RECEIVE
We use various tracking tools and technologies, such as analytics tools (collectively, "Tracking Tools") across the Services to collect information about you and your activities ("Analytical Information").
Information we collect from you automatically
We use various tracking tools and technologies, such as analytics tools (collectively, "Tracking Tools") across the Services to collect information about you and your activities ("Analytical Information").
Log Files
We collect log files. Examples of the information inside the log files are: internet protocol (IP) addresses; unique advertising identifiers (such as Android Advertising ID and iOS Advertising Identifier); type of operating system; date/time stamp; referring/exit pages; clicked pages and any other information your device may send to us. We use such information to monitor app health, to diagnose and fix bugs or crashes, or to make future performance improvements.
Device Information
We collect information from and about the devices you use, including how you interact with the Platform and information about the device itself, such as the hardware model, operating system, IP addresses, cookie information, device settings and advertising identifiers, language and time zone.  This information allows us to recognize and associate your activity, and make future performance improvements.
Usage Information
We collect information about user movements (such as the time and date you accessed the Services, the features you used, your preferences, page scrolling and clicks, and for how long you use an App).
We use such information to monitor app health, to diagnose and fix bugs or crashes, or to make future performance improvements.
OTHER SOURCES OF PERSONAL DATA
Some of the personal data mentioned above is collected or received directly from you; however, some of the personal data is obtained by us from third party sources.
An example of third-party sources might be vendors of products and services (“Vendors”), such as the following analytics Vendors we engage in connection with the Services:
1. Google Analytics & Firebase
We use the web analytics service named Google Analytics & Firebase provided by Google LLC. (“Google”) to analyze and evaluate how our you use our services and to understand our users’ demand in order to provide better and more efficient services to our users by improving and personalizing our services and products.
Google’s Privacy Policy
and
Google Analytics Terms of Service
apply to the handling of all information collected by Google Analytics.
2. Umeng Analytics
We use the web analytics service named Umeng Analytics to analyze and evaluate how our you use our services and to understand our users’ demand in order to provide better and more efficient services to our users by improving and personalizing our services and products.
Umeng’s Privacy Policy
3. Advertising Platform
We may integrate some advertising platforms into our apps for advertising purpose.
Google Admob
Google admob's privacy policy is available
here
.
Facebook Audience Network
Facebook's privacy policy is available
here
.
Applovin Advertising Platform
Applovin's privacy policy is available
here
.
Chuanshanjia Advertising Platform
Chuanshanjia's privacy policy is available
here
Tencent Youlianghui Advertising Platform
Tencent Youlianghui's privacy policy is available
here
Pangle Advertising Platform
Pangle's privacy policy is available
here
.
Vungle Advertising Platform
Vungle privacy policy is available
here
.
These Vendors may also collect your personal data through their respective Tracking Tools incorporated or embedded within our Services.
HOW WE USE PERSONAL DATA
We use your personal data to operate, provide, and enhance the user experience.
We use the personal data and other information that we collect or receive for the following purposes:
To operate, provide, and maintain the Services;
To develop new products, services, and features;
To enrich the content and improve the features available within the Services;
To adapt and personalize the Services, or any of its features, to users' preferences;
To measure, analyze and optimize our marketing efforts and efficiency, and to send marketing
material to you;
To conduct data analysis, research, and statistics, including deep learning, machine learning and/or artificial intelligence, in order to innovate and improve products, services, and features;
To communicate with you (for example, responding to your inquiries or your job application);
To provide you with information about Services, Policies of updates, and receipts;
To monitor compliance with the Terms of Use;
To bill users of paid Services or items, and for conducting internal and external financial audits;
To provide customer support;
To contact you for your views and opinions of the Services;
To register, authenticate, and administer your account;
To keep the Services safe and secure;
To detect or prevent fraud.
Legal Bases (GDPR-only): The legal bases for processing and collecting this personal data and information for the above purposes, may be one or more of the following: (a) your consent; (b) our legitimate interest in operating our Services, as well as ongoing management and development of our business; (c) contractual necessity, such as performing under the Terms of Use or other contracts (as well as in order to take steps at your request prior to entering into a contract); and (d) legal obligation, such as retaining invoice information of our paid subscribers to comply with financial regulations.
WHEN AND HOW WE SHARE PERSONAL DATA WITH OTHERS
We will not share your personal data with third parties, except in the events listed below or when you provide us your explicit and informed consent.
Within our corporate group entities
We may share your personal data with our Affiliates. This may be for the purpose of storing such personal data on our behalf, or for other processing needs that we wish to delegate to such Affiliates. These Affiliates may be based in other countries, and their servers may be located anywhere in the world. Such transfers will be covered by an internal processing agreement entered into by such Affiliates (an intra-group agreement) which contractually obliges each Affiliate to ensure that personal data receives an adequate and consistent level of protection wherever it is transferred to.
With service providers who assist us in operating our business and the Services
We may share your personal data with third party service providers who assist us to operate our business and/or the Services (for example, advertising networks). Our service providers are authorized to use your personal data only as necessary to provide us with their services and not for their own purposes.
If you violate the law or breach your contractual terms with Dream United team
We may share your personal data with any third party (such as law enforcement and legal counsel) if we believe that disclosure of such information is helpful or reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with any applicable law, legal process, or governmental request; (b) enforce the Terms of Use, such as investigations of potential violations thereof; (c) detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud or security issues; and/or (d) protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Dream United team, our users, yourself and/or the public.
If we are legally required to do so
If we are bound to disclose your personal data by a judicial order or by a governmental or regulatory authority, we will comply and share the personal data with that body.
Upon M&A, insolvency, or similar events
In the event that Dream United team is acquired by, or merged or consolidated with, a third-party entity, or otherwise sells or transfers some or all of its business, shares or assets to a third party entity, we may share (as well as assign ownership of and license) your personal data to and with the corresponding third party entity or buyer (whether actual or potential).
THIRD-PARTY SERVICES
Please be aware that while using the Services, you may be directed (via hyperlinks or other means) to, or be able to interact with, third-party websites, apps, services and online communities that are not affiliated with us (such as Facebook, YouTube). Moreover, if the Services integrate with a third-party service, the application programming interface (API) that performs the integration will enable the relevant third party to serve you certain content as well as access some of your Account Content.
For example, if you wish to upload or otherwise share your Account Content to an integrated third-party service such as YouTube or TikTok, or to make use of certain functionality in those services, the API will enable the applicable third party to access your Account Content (such as your photo library).
Additionally, when you pay for fee-based Services or items, your payment will be processed by third party payment processors, such as Google’s or Apple’s in-app purchase mechanism. Any personal data you provide in connection therewith is provided to the applicable third party.
We do not control, and are not responsible for, the privacy practices of such third parties, or for their content, products and services, and we encourage you to read the terms and conditions and privacy policies of each third party that you choose to use or interact with.
SECURITY AND DATA RETENTION
Where we store your personal data
Dream United team does not itself host the Services or operate the underlying cloud infrastructure – all of that is done by third party hosting and cloud service providers ("Hosting Providers"). This means that personal data you provide us or that we or third parties collect from you is hosted with such Hosting Providers on servers that they own or control, which servers may be located anywhere in the world. Your personal data may also be replicated across multiple servers located in multiple countries.
How long we retain your personal data
We store your personal data as long as we need it for the purposes for which it was obtained or until you ask us to delete it. If you ask us to delete the personal data, we may still have to retain your historical purchase or subscription records to comply with our legal obligations, to comply with tax or accounting requirements, to resolve disputes, and/or to enforce our agreements.
Moreover, please be aware that your App-related Account Content is saved on your device, and therefore you control if and when to delete such Account Content.
We implement measures to secure personal data
Our team follow best industry standards to safely encrypt app’s data in transit. We use the HTTPS protocol to encrypt and transmit your personal data information.
We implement appropriate technical, organizational, and security measures to reduce the risks of damage to (or loss of) information, or any unauthorized access or use of information. However, these measures do not provide absolute information security. Therefore, although efforts are made to secure your personal data, it is not guaranteed, and you cannot expect that the Services will be immune to information security risks or attacks.
YOUR RIGHTS
You have the right to access, update or delete your personal data
The following data subject rights apply if you are in the EEA and may apply to you in other jurisdictions:
(a) to know what personal data is being collected about you;
(b) to access the personal data about you that we store on our systems (for which we reserve the right to charge an appropriate administrative fee where permitted by applicable law);
(c) to have us update or correct it (if it is inaccurate or misleading);
(d) to have us delete it (although there may be circumstances in which we are required to retain your personal data, for example for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims);
(e) You have the right to object to, or to request restriction of, the processing of personal data;
(f) You have the right to data portability. This means that you may have the right to receive your personal data in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format, and that you have the right to transmit that data to another controller;
(g) You have the right to object to profiling;
(h) You have the right to know whether your personal data is sold or disclosed and to whom;
(i) You have the right to say no to the sale of your personal data;
(j) You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. Please note that there may be circumstances in which we are entitled to continue processing your personal data, in particular if the processing is required to meet our legal and regulatory obligations. Also, please note that the withdrawal of consent shall not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal;
(k) You also have a right to request certain details of the basis on which your personal data is transferred outside the EEA, but data transfer agreements and/or other details may need to be partially redacted for reasons of commercial confidentiality;
If you wish to exercise any of these rights, please contact us (see the "Contact Us" section below). Please note that in certain circumstances, we may not be the party which holds your personal data, and we may refer you to the party (such as the App Marketplace) which does.
Subject to legal and other permissible considerations, we will make reasonable efforts to honor your request promptly in accordance with applicable law or inform you if we require further information in order to fulfil your request.
When processing your request, we may ask you for additional information to confirm or verify your identity and for security purposes, before processing or honoring your request. We reserve the right to charge a fee where permitted by law, for instance if your request is manifestly unfounded or excessive. In the event that your request would adversely affect the rights and freedoms of others (for example, would impact the duty of confidentiality we owe to others) or if we are legally entitled to deal with your request in a different way than initially requested, we will address your request to the maximum extent possible, all in accordance with applicable law.
Should you ever decide to delete your Account, you may do so by emailing
supersoundeditor@outlook.com
. If you terminate your Account, any association between your Account and personal data we store will no longer be accessible through your Account. However, given the nature of sharing on certain Services, any public activity on your Account prior to deletion will remain stored on our servers and will remain accessible to the public.
MINORS
You must be at least 13 years of age to use the Services
The Services are not intended for minors under the age of thirteen (13). IF YOU ARE UNDER THE AGE OF THIRTEEN (13) YOU MAY NOT USE THE SERVICES. If you are between thirteen (13) and eighteen (18) years old, you must review this Policy with your parent or guardian. If you have concerns about your child’s privacy, or if you believe that your child may have provided us with their personal data, please contact us at
supersoundeditor@outlook.com
. We will take steps to delete the information as soon as possible should we learn that we have collected the personal data of a child under 13 without first receiving verifiable parental consent.
California Privacy Rights
California Civil Code Section 1798.83 permits our customers who are California residents to request certain information regarding our disclosure of personal data to third parties for their direct marketing purposes.
To make such a request, please send an email to
supersoundeditor@outlook.com
. Please note that we will respond to one request per customer each year, unless otherwise required by law.
Our California Do Not Track Policy
Some browsers transmit "do-not-track" signals to websites. Because of differences in how browsers incorporate and activate this feature, it is not always clear whether users intend for these signals to be transmitted, or whether they even are aware of them. We currently do not take action in response to these signals.
Deletion of Content from California Residents
If you are a California resident under the age of eighteen (18) and a registered user of the Services, California Business and Professions Code Section 22581 permits you to remove content or personal information you have publicly posted. If you wish to remove such content or personal information and you specify which content or personal information you wish to be removed, we will do so in accordance with applicable law.
Please be aware that after removal you may not be able to restore removed content or personal information. In addition, such removal does not ensure complete or comprehensive removal of the content or personal information you have posted, and there may be circumstances in which the law does not require us to enable removal of content.
CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
We may change this Policy from time to time. The effective date of the amended Policy will be upon posting the amended Policy, unless a different date is specified. Your continued access or use of the Services after the effective date of the amended Policy, shall constitute your acceptance of the amended Policy. In any event, if you do not consent to the amended Policy, we may terminate your App or Web Service account.
CONTACT US
How to contact our team
If you have any questions or requests concerning your personal data or about our privacy practices and policies, you may contact our team at
supersoundeditor@outlook.com
. Please use this channel only for questions or requests about privacy and data protection.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://www.umeng.com/page/policy:

温馨提示：您的浏览器版本过低，请更换浏览器访问，以获得更好的体验！如您当前没有其他浏览器，可
点此链接下载

产品


产品矩阵
为开发者提供低成本、轻开发的数据服务，从统计到工具产品均可免费、低价使用。
统计分析


移动统计 U-App
App监测与分析平台，助力用户增长
网站统计 U-Web/Plus
流量统计分析，网站数据精细化管理
小程序统计 U-Mini
多平台小程序/小游戏/H5统计分析
开发者工具


消息推送 U-Push
极简接入，精准推送，提升活跃
智能认证 U-Verify
快速集成一键登录和三方登录
合规助手 U-Sec
帮助开发者提升合规水位和合规效率
社会化分享 U-Share
一次集成，多个平台分享能力
智能超链 U-Link
基于DeepLink的深度链接能力
应用性能监控


App端性能监控 U-APM
监控APP性能与崩溃，提升应用质量
H5/Web端性能监控 U-APM
监测请求情况与用户感知类性能指标
小程序端性能监控 U-APM
微信、支付宝小程序性能监控
产品动态
U-APP
推出「流失卸载」功能
07-17
U-Push
「消息查询」功能重磅上线
07-17
U-Push
免费开放地理围栏功能
07-12
付费服务
开发者中心


产品文档
产品和开发文档的综合入口
开发者社区
SDK
SDK一站式下载
OpenAPI
对外开放的API接口
数据开放平台
最新活动


最新活动
新客专享、折扣促销、市场专项等相关活动。邀您使用友盟数据产品，助力业务增长。
「一元用」专区
1元解锁，9大高级功能任你选
限时活动
新用户专区
新用户首月专享19.9元！
长期有效
U-Web Plus老用户升级特惠
站长必用工具升级，限时85折
限时活动
盟创计划
面向“专精特新”企业，提供统计、工具类产品免费或特惠使用
长期有效
品牌动态


官方资讯
最新资讯动态
友盟+学院
合规专区
了解我们


关于友盟+
官方介绍与联系方式
联系我们
客户服务通道和联系方式
加入我们
欢迎加入，共建数据未来
登录/注册
登录/注册
隐私政策
生效日期：
2024 年 09 月 07 日
提示条款
友盟同欣（北京）科技有限公司、北京锐讯灵通科技有限公司（以下可统称为
“
我们
”
或
“
【友盟
+
】
”
，注册地址：北京市海淀区海淀东三街
2
号
7
层
701-26
室
）高度重视个人信息的保护，在您使用【友盟
+
】平台提供的服务时（以下可称为
“
【友盟
+
】服务
”
），我们将按照本隐私权政策收集、使用您和您的最终用户（即
“
您的产品的最终用户
”
或
“
您的产品的终端用户
”
，以下同）的个人信息。我们希望通过本隐私权政策向您清晰地介绍我们对您和您的最终用户的个人信息的处理方式，因此我们建议您完整地阅读本隐私权政策，以帮助您了解维护自己隐私权的方式。
本隐私权政策适用于【友盟
+
】提供的各项服务，您访问【友盟
+
】平台、使用【友盟
+
】提供的服务，包括但不限于我们提供的网站、
SDK
、
API
、插件、组件、代码、工具以及不断创新研发的产品及服务，均适用本隐私权政策。
如您使用【友盟
+
】提供的某项或某几项服务有其单独的隐私权政策的，该等服务对应的隐私权政策将与本隐私权政策一起构成一份完整的【友盟
+
】隐私权政策。如您允许我们与第三方网站共享信息，则同时需受第三方网站服务条款和隐私权政策的约束。
需要特别说明的是，第三方作为信息控制方展示、链接或再封装我们的服务并
向您提供的产品和服务
，
须遵循第三方隐私权政策的规定
，我们无法了解或控制其信息收集使用目的
，
在您已查看并接受其隐私权政策或隐私权政策之前，请谨慎访问或使用其服务。
如果您在欧盟成员国提供服务，本隐私权政策的有关欧盟的特别条款将对您适用。
在使用【友盟
+
】产品或服务前，请您务必仔细阅读并透彻理解本政策，特别是以
粗体下划线
标识的条款，您应重点阅读，在确认充分理解并同意后使用相关产品或服务。如您对本隐私权政策有任何疑问，您可以通过【友盟
+
】公布的联系方式（
Umeng_Legal@service.umeng.com
）与我们联系。
如果您不同意本隐私权政策的内容，您应停止使用【友盟
+
】服务。
本隐私权政策将帮助您了解以下内容：
一、我们如何收集和使用您以及您最终用户的个人信息
二、我们如何使用
Cookie
和网络
Beacon
三、我们如何共享、转让、公开披露您以及您最终用户的个人信息
四、我们如何保护您以及您最终用户的个人信息
五、如何管理您
及您最终用户
的个人信息
六、我们如何处理未成年人的信息
七、
SDK
服务的适用范围及全球化声明
八、本隐私权政策如何更新
九、如何联系我们
一、
我们如何收集和使用您以及您最终用户的个人信息
我们收集信息是为了更好、更优、更准确的完成您所选择的服务。我们收集信息的方式如下：
1
、您向我们提供的信息
当您开通【友盟
+
】服务及您在使用【友盟
+
】提供的相关服务时填写、提交或接入的信息，包括您的联系电话、电子邮箱、企业信息、产品信息、推广渠道、应用程序名称相关数据等。
当您进行企业认证时，我们可能还会要求您提供企业营业执照、统一社会信用代码，企业名称，营业期限，所在地区，详细地址，以及企业认证的支付宝等信息。
我们收集这些信息是为了向您更好提供服务，为了实现这一目的，我们会把您的信息用于下列用途：
（
1
）向您提供【友盟
+
】各项服务，并维护、改进这些服务。
（
2
）我们可能使用您的个人信息以预防、发现、调查欺诈、侵权、危害安全、非法或违反与我们或与【友盟
+
】关联方的协议、政策或规则的行为，以保护您、其他用户，或我们或【友盟
+
】关联方的合法权益。
（
3
）联系您解决问题。
（
4
）经您许可的其他用途。
2
、在您使用服务过程中收集的信息
（
1
）友盟
+ SDK
服务功能及信息采集
（
2
）友盟+ SDK服务权限使用及目的
注意：
1）
以上《SDK合规使用说明》仅公示个人信息类字段与权限使用情况，个人信息字段范围详见国家标准《《GB/T 35273 个人信息安全规范》附录；
  个人信息权限范围详见全国信息安全标准化技术委员会发布的《网络安全实践指南—移动互联网应用程序个人信息相关系统权限申请使用规范》。
  除上述个人信息外，SDK服务将根据服务提供的不同维度采集如下非个人信息类数据：SDK/API/JS代码版本、设备行为数据、浏览器、互联网服务提供商、平台、时间戳、应用程序版本、应用分发渠道、设备型号、传感器参数、终端制造厂商、终端设备操作系统版本、语言所在地、时区和网络状态（WiFi等）、硬盘、CPU和电池使用情况等。
2）
友盟+部分SDK为实现特定功能或基于安全配置需要，我们可能会接入由合作方提供的SDK以共同为您服务。部分服务您可根据自身实际情况选择是否需要集成合作方提供的SDK，具体以您的最终选择为准，具体信息详见
《【友盟+】合作SDK清单》
3）
为帮助您在使用友盟SDK的过程中更好地落实用户个人信息保护相关要求，避免出现侵害最终用户个人信息权益的情形，我们特制定
SDK合规配置指引
（含鸿蒙版SDK采集详情和配置指引），请您参考。
（
3
）访问和浏览【友盟
+
】网站
在您使用我们服务过程中，为识别账号异常状态、设备异常状态、了解和
/
或优化产品适配性，我们可能会自动收集您的使用情况并存储为网络日志信息。在您使用【友盟
+
】服务，或访问【友盟
+
】平台所涉各网站时，【友盟
+
】自动接收并记录您的浏览器和计算机上的信息，包括但不限于您的
IP
地址、浏览器的类型、使用的语言、访问日期和时间、软硬件特征信息及您需求的网页记录等数据。如您访问移动网页使用【友盟
+
】服务时，【友盟
+
】可能会读取与您位置和移动设备相关的信息，包括但不限于设备型号、设备识别码、操作系统、分辨率、电信运营商等。
（
4
）其他
除上述信息外，我们还可能为了提供服务及改进服务质量的合理需要而收集您的其他信息，包括您与我们的客户服务团队联系时提供的相关信息，您参与问卷调查时向我们发送的问卷答复信息，以及您与【友盟
+
】的关联方、【友盟
+
】合作伙伴之间互动时我们收集的相关信息。与此同时，为提高您使用【友盟
+
】服务的安全性，更准确地预防钓鱼网站欺诈和木马病毒，我们可能会通过了解一些您的网络使用习惯、您常用的软件信息等手段来判断您账号的风险，并可能会记录一些我们认为有风险的
URL
。
请注意，单独的设备信息、服务日志信息是无法识别特定自然人身份的信息。如果我们将这类非个人信息与其他信息结合用于识别特定自然人身份，或者将其与个人信息结合使用，则在结合使用期间，这类非个人信息将被视为个人信息，除取得您授权或法律法规另有规定外，我们会将这类信息做匿名化、去标识化处理。
3
、我们如何使用所收集的信息
我们将基于【友盟
+
】数据服务合法采集的数据，按照业内领先的去标识化、匿名化以及假名化等数据安全技术对人群数据进行处理，构建数据智能平台。该平台通过数据加智能引擎服务的方式向您提供数据服务，例如可以将拥有共同特征及偏好的最终用户进行人群分类，提供人群分群管理、人群标签服务，帮助优化投放和提升营销效果。我们确保不会泄漏或侵犯您最终用户的隐私。
在经严格去标识化等安全技术处理无法重新识别特定个人的前提下，我们对所收集的数据通过算法模型进行分析挖掘，无需另行向您通知并征得您的同意。
我们将采取技术措施和其他必要措施进行处理，以无法识别或反推个人信息的形式进行聚合性、匿名性的群体性分析与研究
；在营销场景下，基于用户与机构之间的授权，我们通过去标识化的算法模型预测人群偏好，辅助机构提升营销效果；在反欺诈及风控审核场景下，基于用户与征信机构（如百行征信、朴道征信）、持牌金融机构之间的授权，我们通过去标识化的机器学习和算法模型训练，将友盟SDK合法采集的数据进行汇聚融合和分析，用于识别终端用户的风险，为持牌机构提供预测服务。
4
、您如何合规使用友盟
+SDK
服务
为了保障您的
App
合法合规，您须确保按照当前法律法规或监管要求使用友盟
+SDK
服务，您务必做好以下三步：
• 请务必确保您已经将友盟
+SDK
升级到满足监管新规的最新版本。各类最新
SDK
下载链接：
https://developer.umeng.com/sdk
• 请务必在《隐私权政策》中向用户告知使用友盟
SDK
，参考条款如下。
请注意：收集个人信息类型根据您对SDK扩展功能的选择和可选信息的配置进行公示，友盟各类SDK信息采集详见本隐私政策或官网【合规专区-SDK合规文档】。
使用
SDK
名称：友盟
SDK
服务类型：
请按
SDK
功能填写，如统计分析
收集个人信息类型：设备信息（
Android ID/IDFA/OAID/OpenUDID/GUID；
可选-
IMEI/IMSI/ICCID
）、网络信息
隐私权政策链接：
https://www.umeng.com/page/policy
• 请务必做延迟初始化配置，确保用户授权《隐私权政策》后再初始化友盟
SDK
。
• 各类
SDK
延迟初始化链接：
https://developer.umeng.com/docs/147377/detail/184328
请您务必按照如上提示合规使用友盟
+SDK
服务，并须确保已通过《隐私权政策》等文件取得用户明确有效的授权，相关授权文件及授权记录需要进行存档备查。当用户或行政监管机构向您或友盟提出授权异议时，您有义务提供相应授权文件及授权记录以证明合规使用友盟SDK服务。因您未合规使用
SDK
服务所导致的风险由您自行承担，并承担因此对友盟
+
带来的损失。
二、
我们如何使用
Cookie
和网络
Beacon
为使您获得更轻松的访问体验，您访问【友盟
+
】平台或使用【友盟
+
】提供的服务时，我们可能会通过小型数据文件识别您的身份，这么做是帮您省去重复输入注册信息的步骤，或者帮助判断您的账号安全。这些数据文件可能是
Cookie
、
Flash Cookie
，或您的浏览器或关联应用程序提供的其他本地存储（以下合称
“Cookie”
）。
请您理解，我们的某些服务只能通过使用
Cookie
才可得到实现。如果您的浏览器或浏览器附加服务允许，您可以打开浏览器的设置选项，选择隐私设置，勾选
“
不跟踪
”
，或者禁止
Cookie
，这样您的数据将不会被我们追踪到。网页上常会包含一些电子图象（称为
“
单像素
GIF
文件
”
或
“
网络
Beacon”
），使用网络
Beacon
可以帮助网站计算浏览网页的用户或访问某些
Cookie
，我们会通过网络
Beacon
收集您浏览网页活动的信息，例如您访问的页面地址、您先前访问的援引页面的位址、您停留在页面的时间、您的浏览环境以及显示设定等。
三、
我们如何共享、转让、公开披露您以及您最终用户的个人信息
1
、
共享
我们对您的信息承担保密义务，不会为满足第三方的营销或非法目的而向其出售或出租您以及最终用户的信息。除下列情况外，我们不会与任何第三方共享您
最终
用户的个人信息：
（
1
）事先获得个人信息权利主体的同意或授权。
（
2
）根据法律法规的规定或行政或司法机构的要求。
（
3
）如您
最终用户
是适格的知识产权投诉人并已提起投诉，应被投诉人要求，向被投诉人披露，以便双方处理可能的权利纠纷。
（
4
）只有共享您
最终用户
的信息，才能提供服务，或处理您
最终用户
与他人的纠纷或争议。
（
5
）与广告主、媒体等合作伙伴共享。我们会与这些合作伙伴合作以多种形式将处理、加工后的脱敏数据用于包括优化广告投放和提升营销效果等用途。我们会向这些合作伙伴提供有关广告投放人群策略数据或广告主广告效果的数据，但不会提供任何您最终用户的个人身份信息。我们会与共享的合作伙伴签署严格的保密协议，要求他们按照我们的隐私权政策以及采取严格的数据安全措施来处理和使用数据。
（
6
）
在符合法律法规的前提下，
向【友盟
+
】的关联公司共享您的个人信息
。
2
、
转让
我们不会向任何第三方转让您最终用户的个人信息，除非以下情形：
（
1
）获得您最终用户的同意。
（
2
）在涉及合并、收购或破产清算时，如涉及到个人信息转让，我们会在要求新的持有您最终用户个人信息的公司、组织继续受此隐私权政策的约束，否则我们将要求该公司、组织重新向您最终用户征求授权同意。
3
、公开披露
我们仅会在以下情况下，公开披露您最终用户的个人信息：
（
1
）获得您或您最终用户明确同意。
（
2
）基于法律的披露：在法律、法律程序、诉讼或政府主管部门强制性要求的情况下，我们可能会公开披露您或您最终用户的个人信息。
（
3
）在紧急情况下，经合理判断是为了保护我们、我们的客户、最终用户或其他人的重要合法权益。
四、
我们如何保护您以及您最终用户的个人信息
为了保障您以及您最终用户的信息安全，我们将按照行业通行标准、努力采取合理的物理、电子和管理方面的安全措施来保护您的信息，并尽最大合理努力使您以及您最终用户的信息不会被泄漏、毁损或者丢失。在您的浏览器与服务器之间交换数据时受
SSL
协议加密保护；我们对网站提供
HTTPS
协议安全浏览方式；我们会使用加密技术提高个人信息的安全性；我们会使用受信赖的保护机制防止个人信息遭到恶意攻击；我们会部署访问控制机制，尽力确保只有授权人员才可访问个人信息；以及我们会举办安全和隐私保护培训课程，加强员工对于保护个人信息重要性的认识。
我们有行业先进的以数据为核心、围绕数据生命周期进行的数据安全管理体系，以及根据相关法律法规、各项标准等建立合规制度体系，并从组织建设、制度设计、人员管理、产品技术等方面多维度提升整个系统的安全性。
我们收集的信息保存于不向公众开放的安全运行环境之中。为避免未经授权访问您的信息，我们将其保存在有防火墙保护并可能加密的服务器之中。
但是，没有任何系统是绝对安全的，请您理解在信息网络上不存在
“
完善的安全措施
”
。即使我们做出了很大努力，仍有可能无法杜绝对您以及您最终用户的个人信息的非法访问。此外，由于无法判断他人的陈述是否属实，我们可能会被不可靠的、有误导性的或非法的信息所蒙蔽。
如不幸发生个人信息安全事件，我们将按照法律法规的要求向您或您的最终用户告知：安全事件的基本情况和可能的影响、我们已采取或将要采取的处置措施、您以及您的最终用户可自主防范和降低风险的建议、对您以及您的最终用户的补救措施等。事件相关情况我们将以邮件、信函、电话、推送通知等方式告知您以及您的最终用户，难以逐一告知个人信息主体时，我们会采取合理、有效的方式发布公告。同时，我们还将按照监管部门要求，上报个人信息安全事件的处置情况。
我们会采取合理可行的措施，尽力避免收集无关的个人信息。
我们只会在达成本政策所述目的所需的期限内保留您及您最终用户的个人信息，除非法律有强制的存留要求
。而我们判断前述期限的标准包括：
1
、完成与您相关的服务目的、维护相应服务及业务记录、应对您可能的业务需求；
2
、保证我们为您提供服务的安全和质量；
3
、您是否同意更长的留存期间；
4
、是否存在保留期限的其他特别约定。
在您的个人信息超出保留期间后，我们会根据适用法律的要求删除您的个人信息，或使其匿名化处理。
五、
如何管理您及您最终用户的个人信息
您可以通过以下方式访问及管理您的信息。
1
、查询、更正和补充您的信息。
我们将努力使您能审阅、更正或补充您存在我们这里的信息。如需审阅、更正或补充，请访问我们的网站并登录您的账号予以操作。
您可以通过工单系统（具体路径为登陆您的账号，点击客服工单进行反馈）或个人信息保护专职邮箱（Umeng_Legal@service.umeng.com）与我们联系，我们协助您进行相应操作。
2
、账号注销与删除您的个人信息。
如您不希望继续使用我们的产品，您可以通过工单系统（
具体路径为登陆您的账号，点击客服工单进行工单反馈）
向我们提交注销账号的申请，我们通常会在
15
个工作日内回应您的申请需求，但为了您的账号安全，我们会辨别您身份、核实并处理您的请求，我们将需要您提交充分有效的身份信息。账号注销后，我们将不再为您提供服务，如果您希望我们删除您的个人信息，您也可以向我们提交删除您个人信息的申请。
3
、获取个人信息副本。
您有权通过向我们发送请求，获取您有关个人基本资料的副本。在技术可行的前提下，例如数据接口匹配，我们还可按您的要求，直接将您的个人信息副本传输给您指定的第三方。
如您的最终用户需要获取其个人信息的副本，可以向我们发起请求，当我们完成最终用户的身份核验工作后，将返还其个人信息副本。
六、
我们如何处理未成年人的信息
我们非常重视未成年人的个人信息保护，如经实名认证判断您属于未成年，则无法享受我们的服务。如您的应用是针对未成年人而开发的，请您采取必要的措施确保您
最终
用户的注册与使用均已获得其监护人的同意，同时，您应在您的隐私权政策中履行相应的告知义务。提醒您注意的是，作为未成年人类的应用，您还需要遵守应用市场有关未成年人类应用的审核标准与指南，以免对您的应用上架或正常运营产生影响。
受制于现有技术和业务模式，我们很难主动识别未成年人的信息，如果未成年人的监护人发现存在未经授权而收集未成年人个人信息，监护人可通知我们予以删除，如我们自己发现前述情形，我们也会主动予以删除。
七、
SDK
服务的适用范围
我们的
SDK
面向中国境内开发者提供服务，我们将在中国境内储存您的数据。
为了避免您由于不了解您的最终用户所在国或所在地区关于数据保护相关法规政策而触犯当地的监管规定，
我们强烈建议您仅在中华人民共和国大陆地区内使用【友盟
+
】服务。如您将【友盟
+
】服务应用于中华人民共和国大陆地区以外，
有关您最终用户的信息和资料将传输到在新加坡或德国的服务器上
。您可能涉嫌违反中国现行法律法规中的有关跨境传输的相关规定，由此引发的相应风险及后果均由您自行承担。我们强烈建议您咨询当地专业人士，以保证此项跨境传输符合当地的监管要求，特别是，当跨境传输涉及到俄罗斯、印度、欧盟、美国等国家或地区时，请注意这些国家和地区的个人信息监管规定。您需独立承担可能产生的全部风险，如导致【友盟
+
】发生任何形式的损失，您负责给予我们全额赔偿。
若您在欧盟地区提供服务，我们的业务可能需要我们转移您最终用户的个人数据至欧盟以外的国家。这些国家可能提供与欧盟国家不同水平的数据保护。我们作为您最终用户个人数据的受托处理者，会采取适当的措施以确保履行保密义务，并确保如标准合同条款等措施的执行。
八、
本隐私权政策如何更新
我们可能适时会对本隐私权政策进行调整或变更，本隐私权政策的任何更新将以标注更新时间的方式公布在【友盟
+
】网站上，除法律法规或监管规定另有强制性规定外，经调整或变更的内容一经通知或公布后的
7
日后生效。
未经您明确同意我们不会限制您按照本政策所应享有的权利。对于重大变更，我们还会提供更为显著的通知（包括通过网站或客户端首页公示的方式进行通知甚至向您提供弹窗提示）。
本政策所指的重大变更包括但不限于：
1
、我们的服务模式发生重大变化。如处理用户信息的目的、用户信息的使用方式等。
2
、我们在控制权、组织架构等方面发生重大变化。如业务调整、破产并购等引起的所有者变更等。
3
、个人信息共享、转让或公开披露的主要对象发生变化。
4
、您参与个人信息处理方面的权利及其行使方式发生重大变化。
5
、我们负责处理用户信息安全的责任部门、联络方式及投诉渠道发生变化时。
6
、个人信息安全影响评估报告表明存在高风险时。
九、
如何联系我们
如果您对本隐私权政策有任何问题、建议或投诉，请您通过工单系统（具体路径为登陆您的账号，点击客服工单，选择法务问题咨询进行工单反馈）。我们将在收到咨询后的
15
个工作日内予以回复。
我们还设立了个人信息保护专职部门，您可以通过（
Umeng_Legal@service.umeng.com
）与其联系，您也可以通过工单系统或者北京市朝阳区望京东园
6
号楼金辉大厦
30
层与其取得联系。
如果您对我们的回复不满意，特别是您认为我们的个人信息处理行为损害了您的合法权益，
您还可以通过向被告住所地有管辖权的法院提起诉讼来寻求解决方案。